Utah statutes.
20A-3-603.   Early voting polling places.

(1)  The election officer shall designate one or more polling places for early voting, provided that:

(a)  at least one polling place is open on each day that polls are open during the early voting period;

(b)  each polling place meets the requirements for polling places under Chapter 5, Election Administration;

(c)  for all elections other than local special elections, municipal primary elections, and municipal general elections, at least 10% of the voting devices at a polling place are accessible for individuals with disabilities in accordance with Public Law 107-252, the Help America Vote Act of 2002; and

(d)  each polling place is located in a government building or office, unless the election officer determines that, in the area designated by the election officer, there is no government building or office available that:

(i)  can be scheduled for use during early voting hours;

(ii)  has the physical facilities necessary to accommodate early voting requirements;

(iii)  has adequate space for voting equipment, poll workers, and voters; and

(iv)  has adequate security, public accessibility, and parking.

(2) (a)  In the event the election officer determines that the number of early voting polling places is insufficient due to the number of registered voters who are voting, the election officer may designate additional polling places during the early voting period.

(b)  If an additional early voting polling place is designated, the election officer shall, as soon as is reasonably possible, give notice of the dates, times, and location of the additional polling place by:

(i)  publishing the notice:

(A)  in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the county; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101; and

(ii)  posting the notice at the additional polling place.

(3)  For each regular general election and regular primary election, counties of the first class shall ensure that the early voting polling places are approximately proportionately distributed based on population within the county.

